Utah statutes.
20A-8-102.   Organization of newly registered political parties -- Rights.

(1)  Any organization of voters whose organization did not participate in the last regular general election, or whose organization polled a total vote equivalent to less than 2% of the total vote cast for all representatives in Congress for any of its candidates in the last regular general election shall comply with the requirements of this chapter to become a registered political party.

(2) (a)  Unless an organization of registered voters is a registered political party under this chapter, it may not place the names of candidates representing that organization upon the primary and regular general election ballots under the common organization name.

(b)  Nothing in this subsection prohibits an organization of voters from qualifying candidates as independent candidates or as write-in candidates.

